Utah statutes.
16-10a-202.   Articles of incorporation.
(1)  The articles of incorporation shall set forth:
(a)  the purpose or purposes for which the corporation is organized;
(b)  a corporate name for the corporation that satisfies the requirements of
Section 16-10a-401;
(c)  the number of shares the corporation is authorized to issue;
(d)  the information required by Section 16-10a-601 with respect to each class
of shares the corporation is authorized to issue;
(e)  the information required by Subsection 16-17-203(1); and
(f)  the name and address of each incorporator.
(2)  The articles of incorporation may set forth:
(a)  the names and addresses of the individuals who are to serve as the
initial directors;
(b)  provisions not inconsistent with law regarding:
(i)  managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation;
(ii)  defining, limiting, and regulating the powers of the corporation, its
board of directors, and its shareholders;
(iii)  a par value for authorized shares or classes of shares; and
(iv)  the imposition of personal liability on shareholders for the debts of
the corporation to a specified extent and upon specified conditions; and
(c)  any provision that under this chapter is permitted to be in the articles
of incorporation or required or permitted to be set forth in the bylaws
including elective provisions which, to be effective, must be included in the
articles of incorporation, as provided in this chapter.
(3)  It shall be sufficient under Subsection (1)(a) to state, either alone or
with other purposes, that the purpose of the corporation is to engage in any
lawful act or activity for which corporations may be organized under the Utah
Revised Business Corporation Act, and by such statement all lawful acts and
activities shall be within the purposes of the corporation, except for express
limitations, if any.
(4)  The articles of incorporation need not set forth any of the corporate
powers enumerated in this chapter.
(5)  The articles of incorporation shall be signed by each incorporator and
meet the filing requirements of Section 16-10a-120.
(6)  The appointment of the registered agent shall be signed by the registered
agent on the articles of incorporation or on an attached acknowledgement.
(7)  If this chapter conditions any matter upon the presence of a provision in
the bylaws, the condition is satisfied if the provision is present either in
the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.  If this chapter conditions any
matter upon the absence of a provision in the bylaws, the condition is
satisfied only if the provision is absent from both the articles of
incorporation and the bylaws.
